Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.118

Circular intersection.

(1) "Circular intersection" means an intersection characterized by a circulatory roadway, generally circular in design, located in the center of the intersection. A circular intersection encompasses the area bounded by the outermost curb line or, if there is no curb, the edge of the pavement, and includes crosswalks on any entering or exiting roadway.

(2) "Circular intersection" includes:

(a) Roundabouts;

(b) Rotaries; and

(c) Traffic circles.

[ 2020 c 199 s 1.]